Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 14 Special Elections and Primaries Generally; Municipal Terms of Office
21-2-544.
Special election for General Assembly vacancy.

Whenever a vacancy shall occur or exist in either house of the General Assembly, such vacancy shall be filled as follows:

If such vacancy shall occur during a session of the General Assembly, the Governor shall issue, within ten days after the occurrence of such vacancy, a writ of election to the Secretary of State for a special election to fill such vacancy which shall be held on the date named in the writ, which shall not be fewer than 30 nor more than 60 days after its issuance;

Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this Code section, if such vacancy shall occur after the conclusion of the regular session which is held during the first year of the term of office of members of the General Assembly, but more than 60 days prior to the Tuesday following the first Monday in November of the first year of the term of office of members of the General Assembly, the Governor may issue at any time but no later than 60 days prior to the Tuesday following the first Monday in November of the first year of the term of office of members of the General Assembly a writ of election to the Secretary of State for a special election to fill such vacancy which shall be held not fewer than 30 days after its issuance nor later than 60 days prior to the Tuesday following the first Monday in November of the first year of the term of office of members of the General Assembly;

If such vacancy shall occur after the conclusion of the regular session of the General Assembly held during the first year of the term of office of members of the General Assembly during the period beginning 60 days prior to the Tuesday following the first Monday in November of such year and ending on the day prior to the beginning of the regular session of the General Assembly held during the second year of the term of office of members of the General Assembly, the Governor shall issue, within ten days after the occurrence of such vacancy, a writ of election to the Secretary of State for a special election to fill such vacancy which shall be held on the date named in the writ, which shall not be fewer than 30 nor more than 60 days after its issuance;

If such vacancy shall occur following the election of a member of the General Assembly but prior to such member taking office, such vacancy shall be filled in accordance with Code Section 21-2-504, but such election shall be called within ten days of such vacancy and shall be held not fewer than 30 nor more than 60 days following the date of such call;

If such vacancy shall occur following the conclusion of the regular session of the General Assembly during the second year of the term of office of members of the General Assembly, the issuance of a writ of election to fill such vacancy shall be in the discretion of the Governor except as otherwise provided in paragraph (6) of this Code section and if the Governor chooses to issue such writ of election to fill such vacancy, such election shall be held on the date named in the writ, which shall not be fewer than 30 nor more than 60 days after its issuance; or

If such vacancy shall exist at a time when the members of the General Assembly shall be required to meet in special session, the Governor shall issue, within two days after the calling of an extraordinary session of the General Assembly during the existence of such vacancy, a writ of election to the Secretary of State for a special election to fill such vacancy which shall be held on the date named in the writ, which shall not be fewer than 30 nor more than 60 days after its issuance; or

If such vacancy shall occur after the issuance by the Governor of a call for an extraordinary session of the General Assembly, but prior to the conclusion of such extraordinary session, the Governor shall issue, within five days after the occurrence of such vacancy, a writ of election to the Secretary of State for a special election to fill such vacancy which shall be held on the date named in the writ, which shall not be fewer than 30 nor more than 60 days after its issuance.

Upon receiving the writ of election from the Governor, the Secretary of State shall then transmit the writ of election to the superintendent of each county involved and shall publish the call of the election.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-805, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 3, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 88, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 638, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 230, § 16; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 43/SB 92.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Calls for primaries and elections, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Dates of Primaries and Elections, § 183-1-8-.01.

Law reviews.

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 114 (2001).

21-2-545.
Procedure as to unopposed candidates.

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, in the event there is no opposed candidate in a precinct in a special primary, no special primary shall be held in such precinct. The proper officials of the unopposed candidate’s political party shall certify him or her as the party nominee for the office involved for the purpose of having his or her name placed upon the special election ballots or ballot labels. Where feasible, the superintendent shall provide notice reasonably calculated to inform the affected electorate that no special primary election is to be conducted. Each such unopposed candidate shall be deemed to have voted for himself or herself. The superintendent shall certify any such unopposed candidate as nominated in the same manner as he or she certifies other candidates nominated pursuant to Code Section 21-2-493.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-545

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1, § 15; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-546.
Filling chief judge vacancies in civil and magistrate courts.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, in each county in this state in which there is a civil and magistrate court established by local Act of the General Assembly, vacancies in the office of chief judge of such court caused by death, retirement, resignation, or otherwise shall be filled by the appointment of a qualified person by the Governor to serve until a successor is duly elected and qualified and until January 1 of the year following the next general election which is more than six months following such person’s appointment.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-546

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 46/SB 202.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective March 25, 2021.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).